Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2621.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5939HV (2) 91 as/js H.F. 2621 Section 1. Section 708.6, Code 2026, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 708.6 Intimidation with a dangerous weapon. 3 1. A person commits a class âCâ felony when the person, 4 with the intent to injure or provoke fear or anger in another , 5 shoots, throws, launches, or discharges a dangerous weapon 6 at another person or at , into, or in a building, vehicle, 7 airplane, railroad engine, railroad car, or boat, occupied by 8 another person, or within an assembly of people, and thereby 9 places the occupants or people in reasonable apprehension 10 of serious injury or threatens to commit such an act under 11 circumstances raising a reasonable expectation that the threat 12 will be carried out. 13 2. A person commits a class âDâ felony when the person 14 shoots, throws, launches, or discharges a dangerous weapon 15 at another person or at , into, or in a building, vehicle, 16 airplane, railroad engine, railroad car, or boat, occupied by 17 another person, or within an assembly of people, and thereby 18 places the occupants or people in reasonable apprehension 19 of serious injury or threatens to commit such an act under 20 circumstances raising a reasonable expectation that the threat 21 will be carried out. 22